Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB368.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 44 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 83INVESTIGATIONSSubchapterA. Eyewitness IdentificationsB. (Reserved)SUBCHAPTER AEYEWITNESS IDENTIFICATIONSSec.8301. Scope of subchapter.8302. Legislative purpose.8303. Definitions.12345678910111213141516171819 8304. Eyewitness identification procedures.8305. Jury instructions.8306. Education and training program.§ 8301. Scope of subchapter.This subchapter relates to eyewitness identification improvement.§ 8302. Legislative purpose.The purpose of this subchapter is to help solve crime, convict the guilty and protect the innocent in criminal proceedings by improving procedures for eyewitness identification of suspected perpetrators while ensuring that police can promptly, safely and effectively investigate crimes.§ 8303. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this subchapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Administrator." The individual who conducts a live lineup or photo lineup."Blind lineup." A lineup where either of the following occurs:(1) For a live lineup or photo lineup, the administrator does not know the identity of the suspect.(2) For a photo lineup in which the administrator knows the identity of the suspect, the administrator does not know which photograph the eyewitness is viewing at a given time."Eyewitness." An individual who observes another individual at or near the scene of a criminal offense."Filler." An individual who is not suspected of an offense and is included in an identification procedure."Identification procedure." As follows:20250SB0368PN0316 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) An investigative procedure in which a law enforcement official requests an eyewitness to attempt to identify an individual who perpetrated a criminal offense.(2) The term includes:(i) A live lineup.(ii) A photo lineup.(iii) A show-up."Law enforcement agency." A governmental entity whose responsibilities include enforcement of criminal laws or the investigation of suspected criminal activity."Law enforcement officer." An officer or other employee of a law enforcement agency whose personal responsibilities include enforcement of criminal laws or the investigation of suspected criminal activity."Live lineup." An identification procedure in which several individuals, including the suspect and fillers, are displayed to an eyewitness for the purpose of determining whether the eyewitness identifies the suspect as the perpetrator."Photo lineup." An identification procedure in which an array of photographs, comprising a photograph of the suspect and photographs of fillers, is displayed to an eyewitness either in hard copy form or via computer for the purpose of determining whether the eyewitness identifies the suspect as the perpetrator."Show-up." An identification procedure in which an eyewitness is presented with a suspect for the purpose of determining whether the eyewitness identifies the individual as the perpetrator."Suspect." The individual believed by law enforcement investigators to be the possible perpetrator of the crime.20250SB0368PN0316 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 8304. Eyewitness identification procedures.(a) Compliance.--An eyewitness identification procedure conducted by a law enforcement agency must comply with this section.(b) Description of the perpetrator.--(1) Except as provided under subsection (h)(1), the eyewitness's description of the perpetrator and the circumstances under which the eyewitness observed the perpetrator, in the eyewitness's own words, shall be obtained and documented immediately prior to a live lineup or photo lineup, unless a description was recorded or otherwise documented by law enforcement personnel before the commencement of the identification procedure.(2) An eyewitness description shall be preserved and provided as part of discovery.(c) Blind lineup administration.--(1) Subject to the exceptions in this subsection, a blind lineup shall be conducted.(2) If a lineup is not blind, the administrator shall state in writing the reason that a blind lineup was not used.(3) A blind lineup shall not be required to be conducted if any of the following apply:(i) A blind lineup is not practicable under the circumstances. The administrator shall state in writing the reasons that a blind lineup is not practicable.(ii) The law enforcement agency employs a single lineup administrator who conducts each of its lineups, counsel for the suspect is present at the lineup and the identification procedure complies with subsections (d), (e), (f), (g), (i) and (j).20250SB0368PN0316 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii) The law enforcement agency audiovisually records the identification process and the identification procedure complies with subsections (d), (e), (f), (g), (i) and (j).(d) Prelineup instructions.--Prior to a live lineup or photo lineup, the administrator shall apprise the eyewitness of all of the following:(1) That the perpetrator may or may not be among the individuals presented in the identification procedure and that the eyewitness shall not assume that the administrator knows who the perpetrator is.(2) That an individual's appearance can change based on facial hair, weight or hair color.(3) That it is just as important to eliminate innocent individuals as it is to identify potential suspects.(4) That the eyewitness should not feel compelled to make an identification.(5) That the investigation will continue whether or not an identification is made.(6) That if an identification is made, the administrator will ask the eyewitness to state, in the eyewitness's own words, how confident the eyewitness is of the identification.(e) Contact among eyewitnesses.--If more than one eyewitness views a live lineup or photo lineup in a session, the administrator may not permit the eyewitnesses to communicate with each other until all identification procedures in the session have been completed. Reasonable efforts shall be made so that an eyewitness does not see or hear the identification or nonidentification made by any other eyewitness.(f) Lineup composition.--The administrator shall conduct the 20250SB0368PN0316 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 lineup in a manner that:(1) Only one suspect is included in a live lineup or photo lineup.(2) In a live lineup:(i) Each lineup participant is out of view of the eyewitness prior to the identification procedure.(ii) At least five fillers are used.(iii) If a lineup participant is requested to speak, move, gesture or change clothing, all lineup participants shall be asked to do the same.(3) In a photo lineup:(i) The photograph of the suspect is placed in a different position in the lineup for each eyewitness.(ii) At least five fillers are used.(iii) The photo lineup shall be preserved in the original form the photo lineup was shown to each eyewitness.(g) Comment after lineup.--An administrator or law enforcement officer may not comment or otherwise indicate whether an identification has identified a suspect.(h) Show-ups.--(1) If practicable and safe for the eyewitness and law enforcement officers, the individual conducting the show-up shall obtain the eyewitness's description of the perpetrator and shall record or otherwise document the description before commencing the show-up, which shall be preserved and provided as part of discovery. If compliance with this paragraph is not practicable or safe, the individual conducting the show-up shall state in writing the reasons for the failure to comply, which shall be provided as part of discovery.20250SB0368PN0316 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) If practicable and safe for the eyewitness and the law enforcement officers, the individual conducting the show-up shall apprise the eyewitness of each of the following before commencing the show-up:(i) That the perpetrator may or may not be the individual presented to the eyewitness.(ii) That the eyewitness should not feel compelled to make an identification.(iii) That the investigation will continue whether or not an identification is made.(iv) That if an identification is made, the administrator will ask the eyewitness to state, in the eyewitness's own words, how certain the eyewitness is of the identification.(3) When performing a show-up, law enforcement personnel shall take reasonable measures to preclude the eyewitness from drawing inferences prejudicial to the suspect, including the following:(i) Refraining from suggesting through statements or nonverbal conduct that the suspect is or may be the perpetrator of the crime.(ii) If practicable and safe for the eyewitness and the law enforcement officers, removing handcuffs from the suspect and having the show-up take place at some distance from a squad car.(4) If there are multiple eyewitnesses to a criminal offense under investigation, police shall make reasonable efforts to prevent an eyewitness from seeing or hearing the identification or nonidentification made by any other eyewitness.20250SB0368PN0316 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (5) If an eyewitness is requested to make an identification of more than one suspect at a show-up, the suspects shall be separated and the individual conducting the show-up shall perform a separate show-up for each suspect when practicable and safe for the eyewitness and the law enforcement officers.(i) Confidence statement.--If an eyewitness identifies an individual as the perpetrator at an identification procedure, the administrator shall immediately request a statement from the eyewitness, in the eyewitness's own words, as to the eyewitness's confidence level that the individual identified is the perpetrator. The eyewitness must not be permitted to see or hear any information concerning the identified individual until after the administrator obtains the eyewitness's confidence statement.(j) Record.--The administrator shall make an audiovisual or audio recording of the identification procedure. In addition to the recording, the administrator shall document and include each identification and any nonidentification result obtained during the identification procedure as well as any confidence statement, which shall be preserved and provided as part of discovery.§ 8305. Jury instructions.(a) Requirements of subchapter.--At the request of either party, the trial court may instruct the jury as to the requirements of this subchapter and how compliance or failure to comply with the requirements may affect the reliability of the identification.(b) Failure to comply with subchapter.--If sufficient evidence of failure to comply with this subchapter is presented 20250SB0368PN0316 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 at trial, the trial court shall instruct the jury that the jury may consider the evidence of noncompliance as a reason to view the identification evidence with caution.§ 8306. Education and training program.(a) Establishment.--(1) As soon as practicable, the Pennsylvania State Police and the Municipal Police Officers' Education and Training Commission, in conjunction with the Pennsylvania District Attorneys Association, the Pennsylvania Innocence Project, the Pennsylvania Association of Criminal Defense Lawyers, the Public Defender Association of Pennsylvania and the Juvenile Defenders Association of Pennsylvania, shall establish a comprehensive education and training program on eyewitness identification, including the procedures under section 8304 (relating to eyewitness identification procedures).(2) As scientific findings regarding variables that affect a witness's vision and memory, practices for minimizing contamination and effective eyewitness identification protocols change and advance, the education and training shall be updated accordingly.(b) Administration.--The Pennsylvania State Police and the Municipal Police Officers' Education and Training Commission shall administer to law enforcement officers and recruits the education and training program established under subsection (a).(c) Completion requirement.--Each law enforcement agency shall require each law enforcement officer who is employed by the law enforcement agency and who performs eyewitness identification procedures to complete the education and training program established under subsection (a).20250SB0368PN0316 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SUBCHAPTER B(Reserved)Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0368PN0316 - 10 - 123